Arkansas statutes. Title 22 Public Property
Chapter 3 Public Buildings and Other Facilities
22-3-924. Legislative intent.

It is the intent of the General Assembly that the Supreme Court and the Court of Appeals shall not be required to pay any rental fees for space utilized in the Arkansas Justice Building.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 149, § 12.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Former §22-3-924, concerning legislative intent, is deemed to be superseded by this section. The former section was derived from Acts 1993, No. 1224, § 14.

Subchapter 10

— War Memorial Stadium

Effective Dates.

Acts 1947, No. 249, § 15: effective on passage.

Acts 1961, No. 228, § 7: Mar. 14, 1961. Emergency clause provided: “It has been found and it is hereby declared by the General Assembly that the Stadium Commission is now attempting to refund its outstanding debt as authorized by Act 165, approved March 4, 1959, but that to date such attempt has been unsuccessful; that the refunding of said debt at this time will not only place the said Commission in a financial position where it can legally make needed improvements to War Memorial Stadium without breaching its contract with the holders of its outstanding bonds, but also to avert a default on such bonds; that an increase in the membership of the Commission, whereof all sections of the state will be represented, will assure the successful refunding of said bonds in that an enlarged membership will be able to contact all bondholders for the purpose of selling such holders on the practicability of exchanging their present bonds for refunding bonds; and that only by the passage and immediate operation of this act may such needed improvements be made and the default on the said debt be averted. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall take effect and be in full force on and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1967, No. 282, § 5: Mar. 10, 1967. Emergency clause provided: “It has been found and it is hereby declared by the General Assembly that due to the large number of members of the Stadium Commission provided for under existing law it is difficult at times to obtain a quorum for the transaction of business; that under existing law the two-year terms of office of members of the Commission do not assure the continuity of service required to properly carry out presently planned improvements to War Memorial Stadium; and that only by the immediate passage and approval of this act may the aforesaid conditions be alleviated. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall take effect and be in full force on and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 2017, No. 269, § 13: Feb. 22, 2017. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Department of Parks and Tourism is well-positioned to oversee and promote War Memorial Stadium; that the transfer of War Memorial Stadium to the Department of Parks and Tourism promotes efficiency; and that this act is immediately necessary in order to ensure a timely transition to minimize any adverse impact on upcoming events to be held at War Memorial Stadium. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

22-3-1001. War Memorial Stadium Commission — Creation — Members — Meetings.

(a)(1)

There is created within the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism the War Memorial Stadium Commission consisting of eight (8) members to be appointed by the Governor with the advice and consent of the Senate.

(2)

The department has exclusive jurisdiction for the operation of the stadium in Little Rock, Arkansas, known as “War Memorial Stadium”, which shall be for the use of all the schools, colleges, and universities of the state under the supervision of the department.

(b)

Each congressional district of the state shall be represented by membership on the commission, and the other four (4) members shall be from the state at large.

(c)

Members of the commission appointed by the Governor under this subchapter, in addition to possessing the qualifications of an elector, shall reside in the State of Arkansas.

(d)(1)

The Secretary of State shall, within ten (10) days and without charge therefor, furnish a certificate to each individual so appointed by the Governor, whereupon the appointee shall, within fifteen (15) days thereafter, notify the Governor and the Secretary of State, in writing, of his or her acceptance of the appointment.

(2)

If an appointee fails to give notice of acceptance within the time required, then the appointment is void, and the Governor shall make another appointment.

(e)

Each member shall be appointed to a seven-year term commencing on January 15 following the expiration date of the preceding member's term and ending on January 14 of the seventh year following the year in which the term commenced.

(f)

Any vacancies arising in the membership of the commission for any reason other than expiration of the terms for which the members were appointed shall be filled by appointment by the Governor, to be thereafter effective until the expiration of such terms.

(g)

Before entering upon his or her respective duties, each member of the commission shall take, subscribe, and file in the office of the Secretary of State an oath to support the United States Constitution and the Arkansas Constitution and to faithfully perform the duties of the office upon which he or she is about to enter and that he or she will not be or become interested, either directly or indirectly, in any contract made by the department concerning the commission.

(h)(1)

A member of the commission who violates his or her oath of office is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be punished by a fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) or by imprisonment for not less than six (6) months, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

(2)

A member who has been convicted of a misdemeanor is ineligible for continued membership on the commission, and any contract so entered into shall be null and void.

(i)

The Governor shall designate a member of the commission as Chair of the War Memorial Stadium Commission, and the member so designated shall serve as chair at the pleasure of the Governor with advice from the Secretary of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism.

(j)(1)

All meetings of the commission shall be held on call by the chair with the consent of the secretary, or by any four (4) or more members with the consent of the secretary, on advance notice to each member and at such place as in each instance may suit the commission's and the secretary's convenience.

(2)

All meetings under subdivision (j)(1) of this section shall be open to the public, and complete records of the proceedings shall be kept.

(k)(1)

A quorum for the transaction of business at any meeting shall consist of not fewer than four (4) members, and a quorum has the power to act for the commission by an affirmative vote of a majority of the quorum, except that the affirmative vote of not fewer than four (4) members is required for the adoption of any motion or resolution involving the expenditure of funds.

(2)

An action agreed to by the commission under subdivision (k)(1) of this section is subject to the approval of the secretary.

History.

Acts 1947, No. 249, §§ 1-3, 5; 1961, No. 228, §§ 1-3; 1967, No. 282, §§ 1-3; 1975, No. 477, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 80-3401 — 80-3403, 80-3405; Acts 2017, No. 269, §
3; 2019, No. 910, §§ 5684-5686.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2017, No. 269, § 1, provided: “Transfer of the War Memorial Stadium Commission to the Department of Parks and Tourism.

“(a)(1)

The War Memorial Stadium Commission is transferred to the Department of Parks and Tourism by a type 2 transfer under §25-2-105.

“(2)

For the purposes of this act, the Department of Parks and Tourism shall be considered a principal department established by Acts 1971, No. 38.

“(b)

All authority, powers, duties, functions, records, personnel, property, unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds, including the functions of budgeting or purchasing of the War Memorial Stadium Commission, are transferred to the Department of Parks and Tourism, except as specified by this act.

“(c)

All powers, duties, and functions, including rulemaking, regulation, and licensing, promulgation of rules, rates, regulations, and standards, and the rendering of findings, orders, and adjudications of the War Memorial Stadium Commission are transferred to the Director of the Department of Parks and Tourism.

“(d)

The members of the War Memorial Stadium Commission, and their successors, shall continue to be selected in the manner and serve for the terms provided by the statutes applicable to the War Memorial Stadium Commission except as specified in this act.”

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment added “War Memorial” to the section heading; redesignated former (a) as (a)(1) and (2); substituted “within the Department of Parks and Tourism the War Memorial Stadium Commission” for “a Stadium Commission” in (a)(1); in (a)(2), substituted “department” for “commission” twice and inserted “in Little Rock, Arkansas”; inserted “department concerning the” in (g); substituted “A member who has” for “Any member who shall have thus” in (h)(2); in (i), substituted “Chair of the War Memorial Stadium Commission” for “its chair” and added “with advice from the Director of the Department of Parks and Tourism” at the end; rewrote (j); redesignated former (k) as (k)(1); added (k)(2); and made stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism” for “Department of Parks and Tourism” in (a)(1) and (i); substituted “Secretary” for “Director” in (i); substituted “secretary” for “director” in (j)(1) twice and in (k)(2); and substituted “secretary’s” for “director’s” in (j)(1).

22-3-1002. Powers and duties generally.

(a)(1)

The Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism has and is subject to the powers and duties conferred or imposed upon the department by this subchapter concerning the War Memorial Stadium Commission.

(2)

The department may make, amend, and enforce all necessary or desirable rules not inconsistent with law to regulate the commission's procedure, powers, and duties.

(b)

Subject to the applicable limitations provided in this subchapter, the department shall:

(1)

Have exclusive jurisdiction for the government of War Memorial Stadium;

(2)

Purchase, lease, or rent any real property, or acquire any real property by the exercise of its right of eminent domain, that right being vested in the department;

(3)

Purchase, lease, or rent any corporeal or personal property;

(4)

Receive bequests or donations of any real, corporeal, or personal property;

(5)

Sell, barter, lease, or rent any real, corporeal, or personal property or convert into money any property that cannot be used in the form received;

(6)

Fix the amount of admissions, fees, commissions, concessions, rents, and other charges to be collected by the department for the use of War Memorial Stadium for athletic or other events;

(7)

Establish accounts in one (1) or more banks and thereafter, from time to time, make deposits in and withdrawals from these accounts;

(8)

Contract and be contracted with;

(9)

Exercise such police powers within the bounds of any real property owned or controlled by the department as may be necessary to abate nuisances and otherwise keep the peace; and

(10)

Take such other action, not inconsistent with law, as the department may deem necessary or desirable to carry out the intent and purposes of this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1947, No. 249, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-3404; Acts 1991, No. 37, § 1; 2017, No. 269, §
4; 2019, No. 910, § 5687.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2017, No. 269, § 1, provided: “Transfer of the War Memorial Stadium Commission to the Department of Parks and Tourism.

“(a)(1)

The War Memorial Stadium Commission is transferred to the Department of Parks and Tourism by a type 2 transfer under §25-2-105.

“(2)

For the purposes of this act, the Department of Parks and Tourism shall be considered a principal department established by Acts 1971, No. 38.

“(b)

All authority, powers, duties, functions, records, personnel, property, unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds, including the functions of budgeting or purchasing of the War Memorial Stadium Commission, are transferred to the Department of Parks and Tourism, except as specified by this act.

“(c)

All powers, duties, and functions, including rulemaking, regulation, and licensing, promulgation of rules, rates, regulations, and standards, and the rendering of findings, orders, and adjudications of the War Memorial Stadium Commission are transferred to the Director of the Department of Parks and Tourism.

“(d)

The members of the War Memorial Stadium Commission, and their successors, shall continue to be selected in the manner and serve for the terms provided by the statutes applicable to the War Memorial Stadium Commission except as specified in this act.”

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment deleted “of Stadium Commission” following “duties” in the section heading; redesignated the former section as (a) and (b); rewrote (a); substituted
“department” for “commission” throughout (b); substituted “War Memorial Stadium” for “stadium” in (b)(1) and (b)(6); and made stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism” for “Department of Parks and Tourism” in (a)(1).

22-3-1003 — 22-3-1007. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

These sections, concerning the Secretary of the Stadium Commission, financing authority of the Stadium Commission, issuance and terms of bonds, execution of bonds, and pledge of revenues and restrictions of bonds, were repealed by Acts 2017, No. 269, §§ 5-9. The sections were derived from the following sources:

22-3-1003. Acts 1947, No. 249, § 6; 1961, No. 228, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-3406.

22-3-1004. Acts 1947, No. 249, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-3404.

22-3-1005. Acts 1947, No. 249, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-3404; Acts 1991, No. 37, § 2; 1995, No. 819, § 1; 2013, No. 1141, § 1.

22-3-1006. Acts 1947, No. 249, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-3404; Acts 1995, No. 819, § 1.

22-3-1007. Acts 1947, No. 249, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-3404; Acts 1995, No. 819, § 1.

22-3-1008. Bonds — Tax exemptions.

The bonds issued under the provisions of this subchapter shall be exempt from all taxes.

History.

Acts 1947, No. 249, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-3404.

22-3-1009. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning limitation of liability of the state, was repealed by Acts 1999, No. 24, § 1. The section was derived from Acts 1947, No. 249, § 11; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-3411; Acts 1995, No. 819, § 2.

22-3-1010. Audit of accounts — Reports.

An audit of the records and accounts of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism concerning the War Memorial Stadium Commission shall be made each year, and a copy of the report shall be filed with the Legislative Council, the Governor, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State.

History.

Acts 1947, No. 249, § 10; 1961, No. 228, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-3410; Acts 2017, No. 269, §
10; 2019, No. 910, § 5688.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2017, No. 269, § 1, provided: “Transfer of the War Memorial Stadium Commission to the Department of Parks and Tourism.

“(a)(1)

The War Memorial Stadium Commission is transferred to the Department of Parks and Tourism by a type 2 transfer under §25-2-105.

“(2)

For the purposes of this act, the Department of Parks and Tourism shall be considered a principal department established by Acts 1971, No. 38.

“(b)

All authority, powers, duties, functions, records, personnel, property, unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds, including the functions of budgeting or purchasing of the War Memorial Stadium Commission, are transferred to the Department of Parks and Tourism, except as specified by this act.

“(c)

All powers, duties, and functions, including rulemaking, regulation, and licensing, promulgation of rules, rates, regulations, and standards, and the rendering of findings, orders, and adjudications of the War Memorial Stadium Commission are transferred to the Director of the Department of Parks and Tourism.

“(d)

The members of the War Memorial Stadium Commission, and their successors, shall continue to be selected in the manner and serve for the terms provided by the statutes applicable to the War Memorial Stadium Commission except as specified in this act.”

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment inserted “Department of Parks and Tourism concerning the War Memorial”.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism” for “Department of Parks and Tourism”.

22-3-1011. Establishment by Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism of bank accounts — Deposits and withdrawals — Preaudit.

(a)

The Secretary of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism on behalf of the War Memorial Stadium Commission may open accounts in the name of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism in one (1) or more banks and deposit into those bank accounts all moneys received from the sale of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism's bonds and from admissions, fees, concessions, rents, and other charges collected for the use of War Memorial Stadium or from any other source.

(b)

From the bank accounts, the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism on behalf of the commission may withdraw funds for payment of the following:

(1)

Cost of the construction of War Memorial Stadium;

(2)

Expenses of the commission's members;

(3)

Salaries of a custodian, groundskeepers, and such other personnel as the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism may employ;

(4)

Insurance premiums for fire, lightning, and tornado insurance;

(5)

Such other items of reasonable expense as, in the opinion of the Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism with advice from the commission, may be required to maintain and operate War Memorial Stadium; and

(6)

Amounts paid contesting colleges or schools.

(c)(1)

All withdrawals of funds in the bank accounts shall be made by use of voucher-checks, the form of which shall be prescribed by the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration.

(2)

All voucher-checks so drawn are subject to preaudit by the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration.

History.

Acts 1947, No. 249, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-3409; Acts 2017, No. 269, §
11; 2019, No. 910, § 5689.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2017, No. 269, § 1, provided: “Transfer of the War Memorial Stadium Commission to the Department of Parks and Tourism.

“(a)(1)

The War Memorial Stadium Commission is transferred to the Department of Parks and Tourism by a type 2 transfer under §25-2-105.

“(2)

For the purposes of this act, the Department of Parks and Tourism shall be considered a principal department established by Acts 1971, No. 38.

“(b)

All authority, powers, duties, functions, records, personnel, property, unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds, including the functions of budgeting or purchasing of the War Memorial Stadium Commission, are transferred to the Department of Parks and Tourism, except as specified by this act.

“(c)

All powers, duties, and functions, including rulemaking, regulation, and licensing, promulgation of rules, rates, regulations, and standards, and the rendering of findings, orders, and adjudications of the War Memorial Stadium Commission are transferred to the Director of the Department of Parks and Tourism.

“(d)

The members of the War Memorial Stadium Commission, and their successors, shall continue to be selected in the manner and serve for the terms provided by the statutes applicable to the War Memorial Stadium Commission except as specified in this act.”

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment rewrote the section.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Department of Parks, Heritage, and Tourism” for “Department of Parks and Tourism” throughout (a) and (b); and substituted “Secretary” for “Director” in (a), (c)(1), and (c)(2).

22-3-1012, 22-3-1013. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

These sections, concerning authorization of financing of stadium improvements by income tax refund check-off and use of improvement and expansion funds, were repealed by implication by Acts 1993, No. 943. The sections were derived from the following sources:

22-3-1012. Acts 1981, No. 545, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-3417.

22-3-1013. Acts 1981, No. 545, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-3418; Acts 1987, No. 879, § 10.

Subchapter 11

— Livestock Show Facilities

Preambles.

Acts 1973, No. 569, contained a preamble which read:

“Whereas, Arkansas Livestock Show Association, a non-profit corporation organized and existing under the laws of the State of Arkansas, is in possession as lessee of certain lands located within the city of Little Rock, Arkansas, and belonging to the State of Arkansas under the terms of a lease dated December 16, 1952 which expires on November 28, 1995; and

“Whereas, said lease requires the express consent of the State Board of Fiscal Control, as it then existed, for subleasing of any of said lands for terms longer than one year; and

“Whereas, Arkansas Livestock Show Association has constructed a regulation size standard stock car racing track on said grounds with a dirt surface and has constructed a straight-a-way quarter horse race track on said grounds but does not have funds and moneys in its possession or under its control to put an acceptable hard surface on said track and to build a grandstand, concession stand, restrooms, guard rails and other facilities necessary to the operation of said race tracks during the annual State Fair and Livestock Show and at other times during the year; and the construction and building of such facilities will require an expenditure of approximately $500,000 and Arkansas Livestock Show Association is negotiating with certain proposed lessees who will build said facilities and pay rent thereon to Arkansas Livestock Association if the term of the existing lease is extended for a satisfactory period of time and the lease is amended so that these facilities may be subleased by Arkansas Livestock Show Association;

“Now therefore ….”

Effective Dates.

Acts 1975, No. 1002, § 10: Apr. 11, 1975. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventieth General Assembly that the various facilities of the Forestry Commission and of the State Fair and Livestock Show are in dire need of being constructed, repaired, improved and equipped in order to provide adequate services to the public and that the immediate passage of this act is necessary in order to continue the availability of appropriations and funds. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its date of passage and approval.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

22-3-1101. Acquisition of facilities by state for holding Arkansas State Fair and Livestock Show — Lease and sublease — Option to purchase.

(a)(1)

The Building Authority Division may enter into an agreement with the Arkansas Livestock Show Association and make such contracts as are necessary for the purpose of purchasing the permanent site of the association and for the purchase or construction of buildings and facilities for the holding of the Arkansas State Fair and Livestock Show.

(2)

Any lands, buildings, or other improvements purchased by the state out of funds so provided shall belong to the State of Arkansas, and the division is empowered to enter into an agreement with and execute a lease for a term of fifty (50) years to the association for the use of the facilities for the sum of one dollar ($1.00) per year.

(3)

The lease shall be:

(A)

Executed at the time the state acquires title to the site now owned by the association; or

(B)

Extended as provided in this section.

(4)

The division reserves the right to cancel the lease, and it shall be forfeited back to the state in the event that no show is held during a period of four (4) consecutive years, unless the holding of any show is made impracticable by reason of war or acts of God.

(b)(1)

The association shall have the power to select architects and to draw and approve plans and supervise the construction of the buildings and improvements for the Arkansas State Fair and Livestock Show.

(2)

During the lifetime of the lease, the association shall be given the option to purchase the lands, buildings, and improvements upon the payment to the state of the principal amount due to the state on the purchase price.

(c)(1)

The division shall negotiate with the association and execute a lease with it for a term expiring December 31, 2055, for the sum of one dollar ($1.00) per year.

(2)

The lease shall include a provision that portions of the grounds suitable for the use of a standard stock car racing track and quarter horse racing track may be subleased by the association to any person who will, as a part of the transaction:

(A)

Hard-surface the automobile racetrack;

(B)

Build appropriate guardrails around the track;

(C)

Build a grandstand for spectators;

(D)

Build adequate concession stands and restroom facilities; and

(E)

Allow that portions of the grounds may be leased to other persons for use in connection with and consistent with the Arkansas State Fair and Livestock Show activities.

(3)

The property that is the subject of the lease described in this subsection includes the following lands constituting a part of the association grounds and parking areas lying within Pulaski County, Arkansas:

(A)

Lots 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, and 12, Block 2, Nettie F. Riffel Addition, City of Little Rock, Arkansas;

(B)

Lots 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, and 12, Block 3, Nettie F. Riffel Addition, City of Little Rock, Arkansas;

(C)

Lots 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, and 6, Block 4, Nettie F. Riffel Addition, City of Little Rock, Arkansas;

(D)

Lots 1, 2, 3, 4, and 5, Block 5, Nettie F. Riffel Addition, City of Little Rock, Arkansas;

(E)

Lots 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, and 10, Block 6, Nettie F. Riffel Addition, City of Little Rock, Arkansas;

(F)

Lots 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, and 10, Block 7, Nettie F. Riffel Addition, City of Little Rock, Arkansas;

(G)

Lots 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, and 10, Block 8, Nettie F. Riffel Addition, City of Little Rock, Arkansas;

(H)

All of that part of the South ½ of the Northeast ¼ of the Northwest ¼ and the Southeast ¼ of the Northwest ¼ of Section 16, Township 1 North, Range 12 West, that lies East of the Rock Island Railway;

(I)

Two (2) acres in the Southeast ¼ of the Northwest ¼ of Section 16, Township 1 North, Range 12 West, beginning at the point of intersection or the East boundary line of the right-of-way of the Choctaw and Memphis Railway (New CRI P Railway) and South boundary of said Southeast ¼ of the Northwest ¼ of said Section 16, running thence in a northwesterly direction along said right-of-way boundary 540 feet, thence due East parallel to the South boundary of said Southeast ¼ of the Northeast ¼ 165 feet, thence due South parallel to the East boundary line of said southeast ¼ of the northwest ¼ 535 feet to the point of beginning, containing exactly two (2) acres;

(J)

All that part of the Southeast ¼ of the Northeast ¼ of Section 16, Township 1 North, Range 12 West, lying east of the Missouri Pacific Railway and South of a line established by following the East line of the Missouri Pacific Railway south 828 feet from its intersection with the North line of the Southwest ¼ of the Northwest ¼, thence East 381 feet, thence Northeast parallel with the railway 150 feet, thence East to the East line of the Southwest ¼ of the Northwest ¼; and

(K)

The South 755.5 feet of that part of the Southeast ¼ of the Northwest ¼ of Section 16, Township 1 North, Range 12 West, lying West of the CRI P R/W, containing six and one-half acres.

(d)(1)

The division shall negotiate with the association and execute a lease with it for a term expiring December 31, 2055, for the sum of one dollar ($1.00) per year.

(2)

The property that is the subject of the lease described in this subsection includes the following lands lying within Pulaski County, Arkansas:

(A)

Lots 1 and 2, Block 2, Nettie F. Riffel Addition, City of Little Rock, Arkansas;

(B)

The West 1/3 of lots 11 and 12, Block 1, Nettie F. Riffel Addition, City of Little Rock, Arkansas;

(C)

Lots 5, 11, and 12, Block 4, McCarthy's Addition, City of Little Rock, Arkansas;

(D)

Lot 7, Block 11, Sunset Addition to the City of Little Rock, Pulaski County, Arkansas, and the West ½ of an adjacent closed alley. And that part of West 32nd and Schiller Streets beginning at the Southeast corner of Lot 7, Block 11, Sunset Addition, thence South 25 feet, thence West 165 feet, thence North 25 feet, thence East 165 feet to the point of beginning; and

(E)

Lots 1 to 22, incl, Block 21; Lots 1 to 22, Block 22; Lots 1 to 11 include Block 26; Lots 12 to 22, Block 29; Lots 1 to 11, incl, Block 23, Adams Addition to the City of Little Rock, Arkansas.

History.

Acts 1945, No. 313, § 4; 1973, No. 569, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 78-1601, 78-1601.1; Acts 2005, No. 125, §§ 1-3; 2007, No. 130, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 6195.

Amendments.

The 2005 amendment substituted “Arkansas Building Authority may” for “Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission is empowered and authorized to” in (a)(1); substituted “authority” for “commission” in (a)(2) and (a)(4); in (a)(3), inserted the subdivision (A) designation, added (B), and made related changes; rewrote (c)(1); added (c)(3) and (d); and made minor punctuation changes.

The 2019 amendment deleted “of the Department of Finance and Administration” following “Building Authority Division” in (a)(1).

22-3-1102. Eminent domain.

(a)

From and after the passage and approval of this section, the Building Authority Division may acquire by eminent domain any real property, including the improvements and fixtures on the property that it may deem necessary to provide a permanent site and show facilities for a state fair and livestock show and for aid to the livestock industry.

(b)

The division, upon adoption of a resolution declaring that the acquisition of the property described in the resolution is in the public interest and necessary for public use, may exercise the power of eminent domain:

(1)

In the manner provided by §§18-15-1202 —18-15-1207 for taking private property for rights-of-way for railroads;

(2)

In the manner provided by §§18-15-301 —18-15-307; or

(3)

Pursuant to any other applicable statutory provision for the exercise of the power of eminent domain.

History.

Acts 1947, No. 253, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 78-1602, 78-1603; Acts 2005, No. 125, § 4; 2019, No. 910, § 6196.

Publisher's Notes.

In reference to the term “passage and approval of this section,” Acts 1947, No. 253, was signed by the Governor on March 19, 1947, and took effect on June 12, 1947.

Amendments.

The 2005 amendment, in (a), substituted “Arkansas Building Authority may” for “Arkansas Livestock and Poultry Commission shall have the right to” and “on the property that” for “thereon, which”; and, in (b), substituted “authority” for “commission” and “in the resolution” for “therein.”

The 2019 amendment deleted “of the Department of Finance and Administration” following “Building Authority Division” in (a).

22-3-1103. Use of showgrounds — Future Farmers of America State Horse Show.

(a)

The Arkansas State Fair and Livestock Show Association shall permit organizations and associations to use the association's showgrounds and facilities for the Future Farmers of America State Horse Show and other related livestock and poultry activities without charge, where the use involves no additional costs to the association.

(b)

When any organization or association is permitted to use the showgrounds and facilities for the Future Farmers of America State Horse Show and other related livestock and poultry activities, the organization or association so using the grounds and facilities shall clean the livestock showgrounds and facilities and remove all trash and debris resulting from that use and shall leave the grounds and facilities in at least as good condition as the grounds and facilities were prior to the activities.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 1002, § 2.